Utah statutes.
10-7-18.   Disposition of money received.
(1)  All money received from the sale of property under Sections 10-7-15
through 10-7-17 shall be kept in a separate fund, and may not be expended, or
mixed with other funds of the city or town, until all bonds and other
indebtedness issued for the purchase or construction of the plant or works,
together with accumulated interest thereon, have first been paid.
(2)  If the property sold brings an amount in excess of the outstanding bonds
and other indebtedness issued for the purchase or construction of the property
sold, the excess shall be deposited in a bank in this state under direction of
the municipal legislative body, and may not thereafter be expended except for
some municipal purpose by authority given by the registered voters of the city
or town at a general or special election called and conducted in the manner
set forth in Sections 10-7-7 and 10-7-8.
